Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [126C.127] GENERAL EDUCATION DISPARITY AID. new text end new text begin (a) A school district's general education disparity aid allowance equals 0.37 times the greater of: new text end new text begin (1) zero; or new text end new text begin (2) the difference between: new text end new text begin (i) the amount of adjusted general education revenue per adjusted pupil unit for the district at or immediately below the 20th percentile of districts; and new text end new text begin (ii) the amount of adjusted general education revenue per adjusted pupil unit for the district. new text end new text begin (b) For fiscal year 2026 and later, a district's general education disparity aid equals its general education disparity aid allowance times the adjusted pupil units. new text end new text begin (c) For the purposes of this section, "adjusted general education revenue" includes the district's general education revenue under section 126C.10, subdivision 1, and referendum revenue under section 126C.17, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue in fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; GENERAL EDUCATION DISPARITY AID.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin General education disparity aid. new text end new text begin For general education disparity aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.127: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end